Vermont statutes. Title 4 Judiciary
Chapter 23. Attorneys

§ 901.
Rules for admission of attorneys.

Justices of the Supreme Court shall make, adopt, and publish and may alter or amend rules regulating the admission of attorneys to the practice of law before the courts of this State.

§ 902.
Board of Bar Examiners.

The Board of Bar Examiners shall consist of 11 voting members whose term of office shall be for four years and until a successor is appointed. Two members of the Board shall be laypersons not admitted to practice law in this or any other state. The Supreme Court shall annually appoint not more than four members of the Board on October 1. Vacancies on the Board may be filled by the Court. The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall issue his or her warrant for the expenses of each member of the Board, when approved by the Court Administrator.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 328

(Adj. Sess.), § 8(c);

1983, No. 81

, § 5;

1983, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5(b);

2019, No. 13

, § 1, eff. April 30, 2019.

§§ 903-905.
Repealed. 1977, No. 235 (Adj. Sess.), § 10.

§ 906.
Conflicting appointments, excuse from attending by Administrative Judge.

When an attorney is required to attend more than one trial, hearing, or other proceeding before a court or commission having judicial or quasi-judicial functions, or both, at times which conflict so that he or she cannot reasonably attend each appointment, the attorney may request the Administrative Judge to designate which appointment he or she shall attend.
The Administrative Judge shall designate the appointment the attorney shall attend and shall notify the presiding magistrate of each court and commission of his or her decision.
The attorney shall be excused from attending at that time any proceedings other than the one designated by the Administrative Judge, and the other proceedings shall be rescheduled.

HISTORY:

1959, No. 169

; amended

1979, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 907.
Licensing and renewal fees.

The Supreme Court may by rule impose a fee on applicants for admission to the bar on motion and on applicants for admission to the bar by examination. The Court may also impose an annual fee on lawyers admitted to the bar of the Supreme Court as a condition of being licensed to practice law.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 81

, § 1; amended

2011, No. 75

(Adj. Sess.), § 102, eff. March 7, 2012.

§ 908.
Attorneys’ Admission, Licensing, and Professional Responsibility Special Fund.

There is established the Attorneys’ Admission, Licensing, and Professional Responsibility Special Fund which shall be managed in accordance with 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5. Fees collected for licensing of attorneys, administration of the bar examination, admitting attorneys to practice in Vermont, and administration of mandatory continuing legal education shall be deposited and credited to this Fund. This Fund shall be available to the Judicial Branch to offset the cost of operating the Professional Responsibility Board, the Board of Bar Examiners, the Judicial Conduct Board, the Committee on Character and Fitness, the mandatory continuing legal education program for attorneys and, at the discretion of the Supreme Court, to make grants for access to justice programs or to the Vermont Bar Foundation to be used to support legal services for the disadvantaged.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 60; amended

2013, No. 67

, § 10.